pt-PT: Material do reforço: Bambu; Viscose de bambu; Algodão; Malha; Microfibra; Modal; Nylon; Algodão biológico; Poliéster; Seda; Outro
fr: Matériau du gousset: Bambou; Viscose de bambou; Coton; Maille; Microfibre; Modal; Nylon; Coton biologique; Polyester; Soie; Autre
fi: Haarakiilan materiaali: Bambu; Bambuviskoosi; Puuvilla; Verkkokangas; Mikrokuitu; Modaali; Nailon; Luomupuuvilla; Polyesteri; Silkki; Muu
ro-RO: Materialul clinului: Bambus; Vâscoză de bambus; Bumbac; Plasă; Microfibră; Modal; Nailon; Bumbac organic; Poliester; Mătase; Altele
en: Gusset material: Bamboo; Bamboo viscose; Cotton; Mesh; Microfiber; Modal; Nylon; Organic cotton; Polyester; Silk; Other
el: Υλικό ενίσχυσης: Μπαμπού; Βισκόζη μπαμπού; Βαμβάκι; Πλέγμα; Μικροΐνες; Μοντάλ; Νάιλον; Βιολογικό βαμβάκι; Πολυεστέρας; Μετάξι; Άλλο
vi: Chất liệu miếng đệm gia cường: Tre; Viscose tre; Cotton; Lưới; Microfiber; Modal; Nylon; Cotton hữu cơ; Polyester; Lụa; Khác
da: Kilemateriale: Bambus; Bambusviskose; Bomuld; Mesh; Mikrofiber; Modal; Nylon; Økologisk bomuld; Polyester; Silke; Andet
zh-TW: 襯料材質: 竹纖維; 竹纖維嫘縈; 棉質; 網眼布; 超細纖維; 莫代爾纖維; 尼龍; 有機棉; 聚酯纖維; 蠶絲; 其他
pl: Materiał blachy węzłowej: Bambus; Wiskoza bambusowa; Bawełna; Siatka; Mikrofibra; Modal; Nylon; Bawełna organiczna; Poliester; Jedwab; Inne
tr: Körük malzemesi: Bambu; Bambu viskoz; Pamuk; File; Mikrofiber; Modal; Naylon; Organik pamuk; Polyester; İpek; Diğer
bg-BG: Материал на усилващата вложка: Бамбук; Бамбукова вискоза; Памук; Мрежа; Микрофибър; Модал; Найлон; Органичен памук; Полиестер; Коприна; Други
ko: 거셋 소재: 대나무; 대나무 비스코스; 면; 메시; 극세사; 모달; 나일론; 오가닉 코튼; 폴리에스터; 실크; 기타
cs: Materiál výztužného klínu: Bambus; Bambusová viskóza; Bavlna; Síťovina; Mikrovlákno; Modal; Nylon; Organická bavlna; Polyester; Hedvábí; Jiný
sl-SI: Material ojačitvenega klinastega vložka: Bambus; Bambusova viskoza; Bombaž; Mrežica; Mikrovlakna; Modal; Najlon; Organski bombaž; Poliester; Svila; Drugo
hu: Betét anyaga: Bambusz; Bambusz viszkóz; Pamut; Háló; Mikroszálas; Modál; Nejlon; Organikus pamut; Poliészter; Selyem; Egyéb
hr-HR: Materijal umetka: Bambus; Bambusova viskoza; Pamuk; Mrežica; Mikrovlakna; Modal; Najlon; Organski pamuk; Poliester; Svila; Ostalo
sk-SK: Materiál výstuhy: Bambus; Bambusová viskóza; Bavlna; Sieťovina; Mikrovlákno; Modal; Nylon; Organická bavlna; Polyester; Hodváb; Iné
it: Materiale del rinforzo angolare: Bambù; Viscosa di bambù; Cotone; Mesh; Microfibra; Modal; Nylon; Cotone biologico; Poliestere; Seta; Altro
sv: Kilmaterial: Bambu; Bambuviskos; Bomull; Mesh; Mikrofiber; Modal; Nylon; Ekologisk bomull; Polyester; Silke; Övrigt
ru: Материал вставки: Бамбук; Бамбуковая вискоза; Хлопок; Сетка; Микрофибра; Модал; Нейлон; Органический хлопок; Полиэстер; Шелк; Другое
ja: ガセット素材: バンブー; バンブービスコース; コットン; メッシュ; マイクロファイバー; モダール; ナイロン; オーガニックコットン; ポリエステル; シルク; その他
nl: Kruisvoering: Bamboe; Bamboeviscose; Katoen; Mesh; Microvezel; Modal; Nylon; Biologisch katoen; Polyester; Zijde; Overig
zh-CN: 裆部拼片材质: 竹纤维; 竹粘胶纤维; 棉; 网眼布; 微纤维; 莫代尔; 尼龙; 有机棉; 聚酯纤维; 真丝; 其他
de: Zwickelmaterial: Bambus; Bambusviskose; Baumwolle; Mesh; Mikrofaser; Modal; Nylon; Bio-Baumwolle; Polyester; Seide; Sonstige
pt-BR: Material do reforço: Bambu; Viscose de bambu; Algodão; Malha (Mesh); Microfibra; Modal; Náilon; Algodão orgânico; Poliéster; Seda; Outro
es: Material del refuerzo: Bambú; Viscosa de bambú; Algodón; Malla; Microfibra; Modal; Nailon; Algodón orgánico; Poliéster; Seda; Otro
lt-LT: Įsiuvo medžiaga: Bambukas; Bambuko viskozė; Medvilnė; Tinklelis; Mikropluoštas; Modalas; Nailonas; Ekologiška medvilnė; Poliesteris; Šilkas; Kita
th: วัสดุส่วนเป้ากางเกง: ไม้ไผ่; วิสโคสใยไผ่; ฝ้าย; ตาข่าย; ไมโครไฟเบอร์; โมดัล; ไนลอน; ฝ้ายออร์แกนิก; โพลีเอสเตอร์; ไหม; อื่นๆ
nb: Materiale i kile: Bambus; Bambusviskose; Bomull; Netting; Mikrofiber; Modal; Nylon; Økologisk bomull; Polyester; Silke; Annet